District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.01

Requirements for benefits.

The Mayor shall, effective July 1, 1969, provide Aid to Dependent Children in the form of foster care when removal of a child from the home of a parent or relative results from judicial determination that continuation in such home is contrary to the child’s welfare, provided:

(1)

The child was eligible for Aid to Families with Dependent Children under District and federal law in effect on July 16, 1996 in or for the month in which court proceedings leading to such a determination were initiated; or

(2)

The child was living with a relative within 6 months prior to the month such proceedings were initiated and would have been eligible under such law had application been made in his behalf.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1701, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(uuu), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-217.1.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(t) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(t) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(uuu) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(t) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(t) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(t) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(uuu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(uuu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(uuu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(uuu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).